prince/dictionaries/he-IL.aff
PFX G N 712
PFX G   0 ב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ב וו
PFX G   0 ב" .
PFX G   0 בו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 בכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 בכ וו
PFX G   0 בכ" .
PFX G   0 בכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וב [^ו]
PFX G   0 וב וו
PFX G   0 וב" .
PFX G   0 ובו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ובכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ובכ וו
PFX G   0 ובכ" .
PFX G   0 ובכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכ וו
PFX G   0 וכ" .
PFX G   0 וכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכב [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכב וו
PFX G   0 וכב" .
PFX G   0 וכבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וככ [^ו]
PFX G   0 וככ וו
PFX G   0 וככ" .
PFX G   0 וככו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכל [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכל וו
PFX G   0 וכל" .
PFX G   0 וכלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכמ וו
PFX G   0 וכמ" .
PFX G   0 וכמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשב [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשב וו
PFX G   0 וכשב" .
PFX G   0 וכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשבכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשבכ וו
PFX G   0 וכשבכ" .
PFX G   0 וכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשכ וו
PFX G   0 וכשכ" .
PFX G   0 וכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשכב [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשכב וו
PFX G   0 וכשכב" .
PFX G   0 וכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשככ [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשככ וו
PFX G   0 וכשככ" .
PFX G   0 וכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשכל [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשכל וו
PFX G   0 וכשכל" .
PFX G   0 וכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשכמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשכמ וו
PFX G   0 וכשכמ" .
PFX G   0 וכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשל [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשל וו
PFX G   0 וכשל" .
PFX G   0 וכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשלכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשלכ וו
PFX G   0 וכשלכ" .
PFX G   0 וכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשמ וו
PFX G   0 וכשמ" .
PFX G   0 וכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשמכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 וכשמכ וו
PFX G   0 וכשמכ" .
PFX G   0 וכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ול [^ו]
PFX G   0 ול וו
PFX G   0 ול" .
PFX G   0 ולו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכ וו
PFX G   0 ולכ" .
PFX G   0 ולכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשב וו
PFX G   0 ולכשב" .
PFX G   0 ולכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשבכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשבכ וו
PFX G   0 ולכשבכ" .
PFX G   0 ולכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשכ וו
PFX G   0 ולכשכ" .
PFX G   0 ולכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשכב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשכב וו
PFX G   0 ולכשכב" .
PFX G   0 ולכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשככ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשככ וו
PFX G   0 ולכשככ" .
PFX G   0 ולכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשכל [^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשכל וו
PFX G   0 ולכשכל" .
PFX G   0 ולכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשכמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשכמ וו
PFX G   0 ולכשכמ" .
PFX G   0 ולכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשל [^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשל וו
PFX G   0 ולכשל" .
PFX G   0 ולכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשלכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשלכ וו
PFX G   0 ולכשלכ" .
PFX G   0 ולכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשמ וו
PFX G   0 ולכשמ" .
PFX G   0 ולכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשמכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ולכשמכ וו
PFX G   0 ולכשמכ" .
PFX G   0 ולכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומ וו
PFX G   0 ומ" .
PFX G   0 ומו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומכ וו
PFX G   0 ומכ" .
PFX G   0 ומכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשב וו
PFX G   0 ומשב" .
PFX G   0 ומשבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשבכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשבכ וו
PFX G   0 ומשבכ" .
PFX G   0 ומשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשכ וו
PFX G   0 ומשכ" .
PFX G   0 ומשכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשכב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשכב וו
PFX G   0 ומשכב" .
PFX G   0 ומשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשככ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשככ וו
PFX G   0 ומשככ" .
PFX G   0 ומשככו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשכל [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשכל וו
PFX G   0 ומשכל" .
PFX G   0 ומשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשכמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשכמ וו
PFX G   0 ומשכמ" .
PFX G   0 ומשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשל [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשל וו
PFX G   0 ומשל" .
PFX G   0 ומשלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשלכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשלכ וו
PFX G   0 ומשלכ" .
PFX G   0 ומשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשמ וו
PFX G   0 ומשמ" .
PFX G   0 ומשמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשמכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ומשמכ וו
PFX G   0 ומשמכ" .
PFX G   0 ומשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושב וו
PFX G   0 ושב" .
PFX G   0 ושבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושבכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושבכ וו
PFX G   0 ושבכ" .
PFX G   0 ושבכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכ וו
PFX G   0 ושכ" .
PFX G   0 ושכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכב וו
PFX G   0 ושכב" .
PFX G   0 ושכבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושככ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושככ וו
PFX G   0 ושככ" .
PFX G   0 ושככו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכל [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכל וו
PFX G   0 ושכל" .
PFX G   0 ושכלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכמ וו
PFX G   0 ושכמ" .
PFX G   0 ושכמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשב וו
PFX G   0 ושכשב" .
PFX G   0 ושכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשבכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשבכ וו
PFX G   0 ושכשבכ" .
PFX G   0 ושכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשכ וו
PFX G   0 ושכשכ" .
PFX G   0 ושכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשכב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשכב וו
PFX G   0 ושכשכב" .
PFX G   0 ושכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשככ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשככ וו
PFX G   0 ושכשככ" .
PFX G   0 ושכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשכל [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשכל וו
PFX G   0 ושכשכל" .
PFX G   0 ושכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשכמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשכמ וו
PFX G   0 ושכשכמ" .
PFX G   0 ושכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשל [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשל וו
PFX G   0 ושכשל" .
PFX G   0 ושכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשלכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשלכ וו
PFX G   0 ושכשלכ" .
PFX G   0 ושכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשמ וו
PFX G   0 ושכשמ" .
PFX G   0 ושכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשמכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושכשמכ וו
PFX G   0 ושכשמכ" .
PFX G   0 ושכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושל [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושל וו
PFX G   0 ושל" .
PFX G   0 ושלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכ וו
PFX G   0 ושלכ" .
PFX G   0 ושלכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשב וו
PFX G   0 ושלכשב" .
PFX G   0 ושלכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשבכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשבכ וו
PFX G   0 ושלכשבכ" .
PFX G   0 ושלכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשכ וו
PFX G   0 ושלכשכ" .
PFX G   0 ושלכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשכב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשכב וו
PFX G   0 ושלכשכב" .
PFX G   0 ושלכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשככ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשככ וו
PFX G   0 ושלכשככ" .
PFX G   0 ושלכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשכל [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשכל וו
PFX G   0 ושלכשכל" .
PFX G   0 ושלכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשכמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשכמ וו
PFX G   0 ושלכשכמ" .
PFX G   0 ושלכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשל [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשל וו
PFX G   0 ושלכשל" .
PFX G   0 ושלכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשלכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשלכ וו
PFX G   0 ושלכשלכ" .
PFX G   0 ושלכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשמ וו
PFX G   0 ושלכשמ" .
PFX G   0 ושלכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשמכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושלכשמכ וו
PFX G   0 ושלכשמכ" .
PFX G   0 ושלכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמ וו
PFX G   0 ושמ" .
PFX G   0 ושמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמכ וו
PFX G   0 ושמכ" .
PFX G   0 ושמכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשב וו
PFX G   0 ושמשב" .
PFX G   0 ושמשבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשבכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשבכ וו
PFX G   0 ושמשבכ" .
PFX G   0 ושמשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשכ וו
PFX G   0 ושמשכ" .
PFX G   0 ושמשכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשכב [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשכב וו
PFX G   0 ושמשכב" .
PFX G   0 ושמשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשככ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשככ וו
PFX G   0 ושמשככ" .
PFX G   0 ושמשככו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשכל [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשכל וו
PFX G   0 ושמשכל" .
PFX G   0 ושמשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשכמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשכמ וו
PFX G   0 ושמשכמ" .
PFX G   0 ושמשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשל [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשל וו
PFX G   0 ושמשל" .
PFX G   0 ושמשלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשלכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשלכ וו
PFX G   0 ושמשלכ" .
PFX G   0 ושמשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשמ וו
PFX G   0 ושמשמ" .
PFX G   0 ושמשמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשמכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ושמשמכ וו
PFX G   0 ושמשמכ" .
PFX G   0 ושמשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 כ [^ו]
PFX G   0 כ וו
PFX G   0 כ" .
PFX G   0 כו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 כב [^ו]
PFX G   0 כב וו
PFX G   0 כב" .
PFX G   0 כבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 ככ [^ו]
PFX G   0 ככ וו
PFX G   0 ככ" .
PFX G   0 ככו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 כל [^ו]
PFX G   0 כל וו
PFX G   0 כל" .
PFX G   0 כלו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 כמ [^ו]
PFX G   0 כמ וו
PFX G   0 כמ" .
PFX G   0 כמו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 כשב [^ו]
PFX G   0 כשב וו
PFX G   0 כשב" .
PFX G   0 כשבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 כשבכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 כשבכ וו
PFX G   0 כשבכ" .
PFX G   0 כשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 כשכ [^ו]
PFX G   0 כשכ וו
PFX G   0 כשכ" .
PFX G   0 כשכו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 כשכב [^ו]
PFX G   0 כשכב וו
PFX G   0 כשכב" .
PFX G   0 כשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX G   0 כשככ [^ו]
