prince/dictionaries/he-IL.dic
אבדך/G
אבדכם/G
אבדכן/G
אבדם/G
אחזך/G
אחזכם/G
אחזכן/G
אחזם/G
אחזן/G
אכלך/G
אכלכם/G
אכלכן/G
אכלן/G
אמצך/G
אמצכם/G
אמצכן/G
אמצם/G
אמצן/G
בטחך/G
בטחכם/G
בטחכן/G
בטחם/G
בטחן/G
בערך/G
בערכם/G
בערכן/G
בערם/G
בערן/G
בצעך/G
בצעכם/G
בצעכן/G
בצעם/G
בצען/G
בצרך/G
בצרכם/G
בצרכן/G
בצרם/G
בצרן/G
גדלך/G
גדלכם/G
גדלכן/G
גדלם/G
גדלן/G
גרדך/G
גרדכם/G
גרדכן/G
גרדם/G
גרדן/G
הבינך/G
הבינכם/G
הבינכן/G
הבינם/G
הבינן/G
הביננו/G
הוכיחך/G
הוכיחכם/G
הוכיחכן/G
הוכיחם/G
הוכיחן/G
הוכיחנו/G
הכילך/G
הכילכם/G
הכילכן/G
הכילם/G
הכילן/G
הכילנו/G
העירך/G
העירכם/G
העירכן/G
העירם/G
העירן/G
העירנו/G
הקדימך/G
הקדימכם/G
הקדימכן/G
הקדימם/G
הקדימן/G
הקדימנו/G
חלצך/G
חלצכם/G
חלצכן/G
חלצם/G
חלצן/G
חרפך/G
חרפכם/G
חרפכן/G
חרפם/G
טהרך/G
טהרכם/G
טהרכן/G
טהרם/G
כבותה/G
כבותו/G
כבותך/G
כבותכם/G
כבותכן/G
כבותם/G
כבותן/G
כבותנו/G
לוותו/G
לוותך/G
לוותכם/G
לוותכן/G
לוותם/G
לוותן/G
לוותנו/G
לחכך/G
לחככם/G
לחככן/G
לחכם/G
לחכן/G
לכדך/G
לכדכם/G
לכדכן/G
לכדם/G
לכדן/G
נטשך/G
נטשכם/G
נטשכן/G
נטשם/G
נטשן/G
נשככם/G
נשככן/G
נשכם/G
סובה/G
סובכם/G
סובכן/G
סובם/G
עוותך/G
עוותכם/G
עוותכן/G
עייפך/G
עייפכם/G
עייפכן/G
עייפם/G
עייפן/G
פנותה/G
פנותו/G
פנותך/G
פנותכם/G
פנותכן/G
פנותם/G
פנותן/G
פנותנו/G
פצותה/G
פצותו/G
פצותך/G
פצותכם/G
פצותכן/G
פצותם/G
פצותן/G
פצותנו/G
פצחך/G
פצחכם/G
פצחכן/G
פצחם/G
פצחן/G
פקדך/G
פקדכם/G
פקדכן/G
פקדם/G
פקדן/G
פשטך/G
פשטכם/G
פשטכן/G
פשטם/G
פשטן/G
צפותה/G
צפותו/G
צפותך/G
צפותכם/G
צפותכן/G
צפותם/G
צפותן/G
צפותנו/G
צרפך/G
צרפכם/G
צרפכן/G
צרפם/G
צרפן/G
קבעך/G
קבעכם/G
קבעכן/G
קבעם/G
קבען/G
קדמך/G
קדמכם/G
קדמכן/G
קדמם/G
קדמן/G
קמצך/G
קמצכם/G
קמצכן/G
קמצם/G
רפותה/G
רפותו/G
רפותך/G
רפותכם/G
רפותכן/G
רפותם/G
רפותן/G
רפותנו/G
רצותה/G
רצותו/G
רצותך/G
רצותכם/G
רצותכן/G
רצותם/G
רצותן/G
רצותנו/G
שכנעך/G
שכנעכם/G
שכנעכן/G
שכנעם/G
שכנען/G
שמחך/G
שמחכם/G
שמחכן/G
שמחם/G
שמחן/G
שנותה/G
שנותו/G
שנותך/G
שנותכם/G
שנותכן/G
שנותם/G
שנותן/G
שנותנו/G
תחמך/G
תחמכם/G
תחמכן/G
תחמן/G
